src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON EABBU_MINIP !!≈ * **@CODE@**  for giving Use/NGminip-tags
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom:»X6ž K ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»X6ži%>n K ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom:»X6ž%> NPxC ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen:»X6ža K ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen:»X6ž K ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen:»X6ž%> NPxC ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc:»X6ža K ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc:»X6ž K ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc:»X6ž%> NPxC ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X6ža%>t K ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill:»X6ža%>sa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X6ži%>jddá%> NPx1V ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill:»X6ži%>j K ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc:»X6ži%>s K ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:»X6ži%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com:»X6ži%>jn K ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:»X6ži%>jnna K ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X6ži%>jd K ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen:»X6ži%>jd R ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X6ži%>jd K ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X6ži%>jdda K ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc:»X6ži%>jn K ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:»X6ži%>jnna K ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:»X6ži%>js K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X6ži%>jgujn K ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com/Sh:»X6žij∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc:»X6ži%>stti%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com:»X6ži%>jnni%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X6ži%>jddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X6ži%>jddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X6ži%>jddás%> NPxC ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc:»X6ži%>jnni%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X6ži%>jddi%> NPxPlComV1 ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+A:»X6š%> ATTRCONT ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:»X6ži%>t K ;
 :%> EABBUCASE1_MINIP ;
 :%> EABBUCASE2_MINIP ;
 +Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>X8t K ;
 +Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv+Err/Orth:%>X7t K ;
 +Attr+Err/Orth: ATTR  ;

LEXICON EABBUCASE1_MINIP !!≈ * **@CODE@**  for giving Use/NGminip-tags
 +Sg+Nom+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:X1 K ; !
 +Sg+Nom+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:X7 K ; !
 +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: NPxVvowch ;
 +Ess:X1n K ;
 +Ess+Use/NG:X7n K ;
 +Ess+Err/Orth:X1n%> NPxC ;
 +Ess+Err/Orth:X7n%> NPxC ;

LEXICON EABBUCASE2_MINIP !!≈ * **@CODE@**  for giving Use/NGminip-tags
 +Sg+Gen:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:X8 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X2 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen:X6 NPx2V ;
 +Sg+Gen:X4 NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:X8 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:X2 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc:X6 NPx2V ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4 NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Ill:X3j K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:j K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:X2s%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Loc:X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/NG:X8s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X8n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc:X4st%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Loc:X8st%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:X5jn K ;
 +Sg+Com:^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:X5jn%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:^DISIMPjn%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:X4t K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:X4k K ; ! !Skániid dialect
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:X5jd%> NPx1C ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:^DISIMPjd%> NPx1C ;
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Gen:^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:X5jd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:^DISIMPjd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:X5jd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:^DISIMPjd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:X5jde K ;
 +Pl+Ill:^DISIMPjde K ;
 +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:X5jdasa%> NPxVvowch  ;
 +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:^DISIMPjdasa%> NPxVvowch  ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:X5jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc:^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:X5jn%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:^DISIMPjn%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:X5jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com:^DISIMPjgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh+Err/Orth:X5j∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com/Sh:^DISIMPj∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:X5jd%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:X5jn%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:^DISIMPjd%> NPxPlComC ;


LEXICON BU/MUS !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Bisyllabic adjectives comparision
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A:b BUStem ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A:muss BUOREMUS ;
 +Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:t K ;


LEXICON BUStem !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 ATTRCONT ;
 +Sg+Gen:u K ;
! +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: K ;
 +Sg+Acc:u K ;
! +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc: K ;
 +Pl+Nom:ut K ;
 +Ess:un K ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+A:»uš%> ATTRCONT ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:»uš K ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+A:»užža%> BUOREMUSSA- ;
 +Sg+Ill:uj K ;
 +Sg+Loc:us K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:un K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:ujn K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ujd K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:ujd R ;
 +Pl+Acc:ujd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ujdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:ujn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:ujs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Com:ujgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:uj∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Sg+Loc:ustti%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sg+Com:ujnni%> NPxVvowch ;
! +Pl+Nom:ujddi%> NPxVvowch ; !^P^ !MARG
 +Pl+Gen:ujddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Acc:ujddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Ill:ujddás%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Loc:ujnni%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Com:ujddi%> NPxPlComV1 ;
 +Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:ut K ;
 +Sg+Nom:u%> NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Nom:u%> NPx2V ;
 +Sg+Nom:u%> NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Gen:u%> NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen:u%> NPx2V ;
 +Sg+Gen:u%> NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Acc:u%> NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc:u%> NPx2V ;
 +Sg+Acc:u%> NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Ill:usa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Nom:uiddá%> NPx1V ;


LEXICON EAMOS !!≈ * **@CODE@** eastern form -amos as well
! The 3 next lines are for MALIS0
! minus the pointer to Ess Px.
 +Sg+Nom:%>X4 K ;
 +Ess:%>X4in K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%>X2 NPxC ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>X2a K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen:%>X2 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>X2 NPxC ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X2a K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc:%>X2 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X2 NPxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>X2at K ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>X2asa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>X2ijddá%> NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>X2ij K ;
 +Sg+Loc:%>X2is K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X2in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:%>X2ijn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:%>X2ijnna K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>X2ijd K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%>X2ijd R ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>X2ijd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>X2ijdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>X2ijn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X2ijnna K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X2ijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Com:%>X2ijgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:%>X2ij∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Sg+Loc:%>X2istti%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sg+Com:%>X2ijnni%> NPxVvowch ;
! +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>X2ijddi%> NPxVvowch ; !^P^ !MARG
 +Pl+Gen:%>X2ijddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>X2ijddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>X2ijddás%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>X2ijnni%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Com:%>X2ijddi%> NPxPlComV1 ;
 :%>X2 ADVC ;
 +Attr:%>X4 K ; ! Attributive superaltives
              ! Here and not in MALIS0 because
              ! also nouns go there.

LEXICON EAMOS_ERRforms !!≈ * **@CODE@** eastern form -amos as well
 +Sg+Nom:%>X4 K ;
 +Ess:%>X4in K ;
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen:%>X2 K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc:%>X2 K ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>X2ak K ; !Skániid dialect
 +Sg+Loc:%>X2is K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X2in K ; ! !SOUTH
 :%>X2 ADVC ;
 +Attr:%>X4 K ; ! Attributive superlatives

LEXICON GAPPUS0 !!≈ * **@CODE@** Almost id. to MALIS0. MALIS0 has no VUOHTA, GAPPUS0 has no Px Ess., and shouldn't have either.
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
! +Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:X7 flagON-R ;
! +Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth: flagOFF-R ;
 +Cmp/SgNom: R ;
 +Use/-PLX: VUOHTA ;			! (callers have added +A already)
 +Ess:in K ;
 +Ess:in%> NPxC ;


!LEXICON GAPPUS- !!≈ * **@CODE@** (not in use)
! MALLAS- ; ! should be flipped with the rest.

!! GOAL: Keep GAPPUS- and MALLAS- apart, because of
!! the Px(1)V issue, but unify the rest.
!! GAPPUS- and MALLAS- differ
!! in the A and N treatment of
!! Pl Nom Px (only 1st p. for A
!! and all persons for N).
!! Now that MALLASI- is deleted,
!! GAPPUS- and MALLAS- are
!! identical. We check by pointing
!! GAPPUS- to MALLAS-. Look into this.
!! and remove GAPPUS- for MALLAS-
!! eventually.

LEXICON MEAHTTUN   !!≈ * **@CODE@** Deverbal adjectives.
@C.NeedNoun@:@C.NeedNoun@ MEAHTTUNcase ;

LEXICON MEAHTTUNcase
 :n%> ATTR ;
 +Attr+Err/Orth:m%>is%> ATTR ;
 :s%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
 :m%> GAPPUS0 ;   ! NE and vuohta
 +Sg+Gen:m%>a K ; ! Stem vowel -a-, no short genitive
 +Sg+Gen:m%>a R ; ! Stem vowel -a-, no short genitive
 +Sg+Acc:m%>a K ;
 +Pl+Nom:m%>at K ;
 :m%>i MALLASI-/NUORABU- ;  ! obl
 +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:m%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:m%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:m%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:m%>asa%> NPxVvowch ;
! +Sg+Gen:m K ;
! +Sg+Acc:m K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:m%>iiddá%> NPx1V ;
