src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON AdjectiveNoPx !!= * **@CODE@** is the main adjective list, not taking Px
boahtteáigásaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:boahtte#áigásačča%> BU/MUS ;
ođđaáigásaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:ođđa#áigásačča%> BU/MUS ;
veahát+A+Sem/Dummytag+Gram/Comp:veaháb BUStem ;
vearát+A+Sem/Dummytag+Gram/Comp:vearáb BUStem ;
viiddis+A+Sem/Dummytag+Der2+Der/Comp+A+Use/NG:viiddib BUStem ;
árrat+A+Sem/Dummytag:ára%> BU/MUS ;
árrat+A+Sem/Dummytag+Err/Orth-a-á:árá%> BU/MUS ;
